Missouri, session 2026, SB1688.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 99, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
six new sections, to be known as sections 99.1250, 99.1255,
99.1260, 99.1265, 99.1270, and 99.1275, to read as follows:
99.1250. 1. Sections 99.1250 to 99.1275 shall be
known and may be cited as the "Missouri Downtown Economic
Stimulus Act Extension Act".
2. The general assembly finds and declares that:
(1) The Missouri downtown and rural economic stimulus
act ("MODESA") established a highly successful economic
development program that resulted in landmark urban
revitalization developments in the state's largest
metropolitan areas;
(2) MODESA-approved development projects in Kansas
City and St. Louis draw over twenty million visitors a year
and are among the most visited destinations by tourists to
the state;
(3) MODESA incentivized over two billion dollars in
private investment in the MODESA-approved development
projects, transforming the state's urban cores;

SB 1688 2
(4) MODESA-approved development projects have
generated thousands of jobs and provided billions of dollars
in economic impact;
(5) MODESA-approved development projects have
successfully drawn thousands of new residents to the state,
and have spurred substantial additional private development
in the state;
(6) The state has benefitted from the receipt of
substantial state tax revenue from the MODESA-approved
development projects;
(7) Pursuant to section 99.975, no new MODESA
applications could be approved after January 1, 2013; and
(8) By extending MODESA for the MODESA-approved
development projects, this law is intended to serve as a
catalyst for new economic development and revitalization in
the state, propel private investment, and generate jobs, tax
revenue, and other economic benefits.
3. Insofar as the provisions of sections 99.1250 to
99.1275 are inconsistent with the provisions of any other
law, the provisions of sections 99.1250 to 99.1275 shall be
controlling.
99.1255. Except as otherwise provided in sections
99.1250 to 99.1275, the definitions set forth in section
99.918 shall apply to expanded development projects under
sections 99.1250 to 99.1275. As used in sections 99.1250 to
99.1275, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
following additional terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of economic
development;
(2) "Development project", any development project
approved pursuant to sections 99.915 to 99.1060 prior to
January 1, 2013;

SB 1688 3
(3) "Development project area", the area located
within a development area, as such development area may be
modified in accordance with sections 99.915 to 99.1060,
selected for a development project or an expanded
development project;
(4) "Developer", an entity identified by the
department as the developer of a development project in a
certificate of approval issued by the department for the
development project, or its affiliate, successor, or assign;
(5) "Expanded development project", any project of a
developer approved pursuant to sections 99.1250 to 99.1275
within a development area, as such development area may be
modified in accordance with sections 99.1250 to 99.1275, and
in furtherance of a development plan, as such development
plan may be amended, modified, or deemed amended consistent
with sections 99.1250 to 99.1275;
(6) "Expansion authority", a downtown economic
stimulus authority for a municipality, created pursuant to
section 99.921, and dedicated to carrying out expanded
development projects. Sections 99.924 to 99.933, and any
other provisions of sections 99.915 to 99.1060 applicable to
an authority, shall apply to any expansion authority;
(7) "Residential income tax increment", eighty-five
percent of the estimate of the income tax due the state and
municipality for the salaries or wages paid to natural
persons residing in a development project area of a
development project or an expanded development project
approved by the department;
(8) "State construction income tax increment", one
hundred percent of the estimate of the income tax due the
state for the salaries or wages paid to workers involved in
or related to the construction of an expanded development

SB 1688 4
project approved by the department. The estimate shall be a
percentage of the gross payroll which shall be based on an
analysis by the department of revenue of the practical tax
rate on gross payroll as a factor of overall taxable income.
99.1260. 1. Except as provided in sections 99.1250 to
99.1275, and upon application to the department consistent
with section 99.1270, sections 99.915 to 99.1060 are
extended and shall apply to a development project and
expanded development project.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, including sections 99.915 to 99.1060, upon
approval of the department pursuant to section 99.1270, the
following shall apply to a development project and expanded
development project:
(1) A development area may be amended, expanded, or
modified, and may include three or more noncontiguous areas;
(2) A development area shall not be restricted to the
central business district and may be amended, expanded, or
modified to include areas outside of the central business
district;
(3) A development project area for a development
project may be amended, enlarged, reduced, or modified;
(4) A development plan shall be deemed to include an
expanded development project approved by the department;
(5) Upon application by the developer, the term of any
obligation issued to carry out a development project and the
term of any payments in lieu of taxes related to a
development project shall be extended to thirty-five years.
Any obligations or requirements set forth in sections 99.915
to 99.1060 shall run with the extended term;
(6) Obligations issued in support of an expanded
development project may be issued by a municipality, an

SB 1688 5
authority, an expansion authority, or any state or municipal
authority formed by a municipality in which a development
project area, or portion thereof, is located;
(7) The term of any obligation issued to carry out an
expanded development project or to refund outstanding
obligations and the term of payments in lieu of taxes
related to an expanded development project may not exceed
thirty-five years. Any obligations or requirements set
forth in sections 99.915 to 99.1060 shall run concurrent
with said term;
(8) The state income tax increment for an expanded
development project shall be up to eighty-five percent of
the estimate of the income tax due to the state for salaries
or wages paid to new employees in new jobs at a business
located in the development project area;
(9) The state sales tax increment for an expanded
development project shall be up to eighty-five percent of
the incremental increase in the state sales tax revenue in
the development project area. The provisions of section
99.918 requiring a de minimis portion finding by the
Missouri development finance board and limiting the state
sales tax increment in relation to the relocation of a
Missouri facility to a development project area shall not
apply;
(10) One hundred percent of payments in lieu of taxes
and eighty-five percent of economic activity taxes generated
in relation to an expanded development project shall be used
each year of the approved term to support development
project costs;
(11) An office displacement percentage and retail or
restaurant displacement percentage shall not apply to an
expanded development project;

SB 1688 6
(12) An application for an expanded development
project shall not be required to demonstrate that it could
not be financed without the use of MODESA or other state
incentives or funding;
(13) Development project costs incurred prior to the
department's approval of an expanded development project may
be reimbursed under sections 99.1250 to 99.1275 and funds
committed or incurred prior to said approval may qualify for
any local match requirement;
(14) An expanded development project shall be eligible
for all tax credits, subsidies, incentives, discounts,
rebates, or other economic development programs authorized
under state law;
(15) In addition to those identified in section
99.918, economic activity taxes applicable to an expanded
development project shall include personal property taxes,
taxes imposed on sales or charges for sleeping rooms paid by
transitional guests of hotels and motels in the development
project area, license fees, and any other fees or
assessments related to economic activity in the project
development area of the expanded development project;
(16) Sections 99.915, 99.954, 99.960, and 99.975 shall
not apply to expanded development projects. Section 99.942
shall not apply to a development project or an expanded
development project. The duration of disbursements under
section 99.960 shall be thirty-five years unless otherwise
determined under this section; and
(17) The department by rule may determine the
reporting requirements applicable to an expanded development
project.
99.1265. 1. An expanded development project approved
by the department shall be eligible to participate in the

SB 1688 7
programs established by sections 67.1401 to 67.1571, 100.010
to 100.200, and 238.200 to 238.280.
2. For any expanded development project approved by
the department pursuant to section 99.1270, the department
shall disburse the state construction income tax increment
to support development project costs or obligations issued
to carry out the expanded development project. State
construction income tax increment disbursements shall cease
within one hundred eighty days of the date on which the
department determines that the construction of the expanded
development project is complete and the expanded development
project has opened to the public. Upon showing that one
hundred percent of the actual income tax due the state for
the salaries or wages paid to workers involved in or related
to the construction of an expanded development project
exceeded state construction income tax increment, the
department shall disburse the excess amount to the developer
of the expanded development project to be expended on or
used to reimburse any reasonable or necessary costs incurred
or estimated to be incurred in furtherance of the expanded
development project.
3. For any expanded development project approved by
the department pursuant to section 99.1270, the department
shall disburse the residential income tax increment to
support development project costs or obligations issued to
carry out the expanded development project. The duration of
residential income tax disbursements shall not exceed thirty-
five years. The approved term notwithstanding, residential
income tax disbursements shall terminate when development
financing for an expanded development project is
terminated. The following shall apply in relation to the
residential income tax increment:

SB 1688 8
(1) The residential income tax increment estimate may
be developed by the department in conjunction with the
department of revenue based on actual tax returns for the
natural persons residing within the development project area
for the expanded development project;
(2) The department, with the assistance of the
department of revenue, shall develop an alternative estimate
for the residential income tax increment that is based on
the greater of:
(a) The median household income for the metropolitan
statistical area in which the development project area is
located; or
(b) The average projected income of the natural
persons residing within the development project area for the
expanded development project, with such average income
projection updated every five years. After the first year
in which the alternative estimate is applied, the
alternative estimate shall be adjusted annually by applying
the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index
immediately prior to the date the adjustment will take
effect; and
(3) The developer shall elect whether to calculate the
residential income tax increment based on the estimate or
the alternative estimate. An election may not be rescinded
more frequently than annually and notice of any change in
election shall be submitted to the department no later than
sixty days prior to the start of a calendar year.
4. Upon application to and approval of the department,
a residential income tax increment may be developed and
disbursed to support development project costs or
obligations issued to carry out a development project. The
duration of residential income tax disbursements shall be

SB 1688 9
concurrent with the term of any obligation issued to carry
out the development project. The approved term
notwithstanding, residential income tax disbursements shall
terminate when development financing for the development
project is terminated. The residential income tax increment
shall be calculated consistent with subsection 3 of this
section.
5. An expanded development project approved by the
department pursuant to section 99.1270 shall qualify for the
most favorable economic development rate offered by a public
utility servicing the development project area for the
expanded development project. The duration of the rate
shall coincide with the term of any obligation issued to
carry out an expanded development project.
99.1270. 1. Approval of an expanded development
project or other authorization under section 99.1270 shall
be governed by this section, which shall apply in lieu of
sections 99.948 to 99.951.
2. An application may be submitted by a developer for
an approval or authorization on a form, and in such a
manner, as determined by the department.
3. An application for approval of an expanded
development project shall include the following:
(1) Identification of the developer and, if the
applicant is an affiliate, successor, or assign of the
developer, documentation substantiating the same;
(2) Identification of the mayor or chief executive
officer of the municipality in which the expanded
development project will be located;
(3) The location of the development site for the
expanded development project;

SB 1688 10
(4) A description of any amendment, expansion, or
modification of the development area associated with the
expanded development project and a resolution from the
governing body or other evidence from the mayor or chief
executive officer of the municipality consenting to such
modification;
(5) A description of any amendment, enlargement,
reduction, or modification of the development project area
of a development project that is related to or sought in
conjunction with the expanded development project;
(6) A description of the development project area for
the expanded development project;
(7) A description of the expanded development project,
including, but not limited to, the facilities, structures,
operations, and infrastructure to be developed as part of
the project, the estimated jobs to be created in conjunction
with the project, including construction and permanent jobs
and full-time and part-time equivalents, the estimated
number of natural persons that will reside in the
development project area for the project, the consistency of
the project with the comprehensive plan of the municipality
as a whole, and the estimated development project costs;
(8) An economic impact analysis showing the projected
economic benefits to the municipality and the state from the
expanded development project;
(9) A description of community and other benefits to
result from the project;
(10) The anticipated sources of funds to pay the
estimated development project costs and evidence of any
commitments to finance the development project costs;
(11) The anticipated type and term of the sources of
funds to pay the estimated development project costs,

SB 1688 11
including the anticipated type of terms of obligations
anticipated to be issued;
(12) The most recent equalized assessed valuation of
the property within the development project area of the
expanded development project;
(13) Information deemed necessary by the department to
determine the baseline estimates for the state sales tax
increment and the state income tax increment;
(14) Information deemed necessary by the department to
determine the state construction income tax increment
estimate;
(15) Information deemed necessary by the department to
determine the residential income tax increment estimate and
alternative estimate;
(16) Projected amounts of state sales tax increment,
state income tax increment, state construction income tax
increment, and residential income tax increment funding
sought in relation to the expanded development project and
the term of such funding;
(17) Projected payments in lieu of taxes and economic
activity payments in support of the expanded development
project and the term of such funding;
(18) Expressions of municipal or local support for the
expanded development project; and
(19) Any other information as the department may
reasonably require.
4. Following receipt of an application, the department
shall determine whether the application is complete. If the
application is not complete, the department shall notify the
applicant in writing of the information needed to complete
the application. An applicant may amend or supplement its

SB 1688 12
application at any time prior to approval by the department
including after it has been deemed complete.
5. Upon determining that an application is complete,
the department shall review the application and request such
additional information that it deems necessary. Within
sixty days of the completeness determination, the department
shall approve the application unless it determines that the
expanded development project is contrary to the best
interests of the state. For an approved application, the
department shall issue a certificate of approval containing
the terms and conditions of the approval, including, but not
limited to, the amount and a description of development
project costs approved for reimbursement or payment, the
baseline year for the state sales tax increment and state
income tax increment, the types and amounts of increments
approved, and the term of such funding.
99.1275. 1. The department may promulgate rules and
regulations as necessary or appropriate to implement the
provisions of this law.
2. In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of
this law, regulations promulgated by the department shall be
deemed temporary regulations which shall expire not later
than two years following the publication of the temporary
regulation. Temporary regulations promulgated by the
department shall be exempt from chapter 536.
3. The department's authority to adopt temporary
regulations under subsection 2 of this section shall expire
two years after the effective date of this section.
Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated
as provided by law.
✓